Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2807
Writ; failure to obey; penalty.

If any person to whom such writ of habeas corpus shall be directed as aforesaid, shall neglect or refuse to obey or make return of the same according to the command thereof, or shall make a false return of the writ, or upon demand made by the prisoner, or any person in his or her behalf, shall refuse to deliver to the person demanding, within six hours after the demand therefor, a true copy of the warrant or commitment or detainer of such prisoner, every person so offending shall, for the first offense, forfeit to the party aggrieved the sum of two hundred dollars, and for the second offense, the sum of four hundred dollars, and shall, if an officer, be incapable to hold his office.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 359, p. 805;

R.S.1913, § 9253;

C.S.1922, § 10282;

C.S.1929, § 29-2807;

R.S.1943, § 29-2807.